Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1222.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 13.32, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Directory information. (a) Educational data designated as directory information is public data on individuals to the extent required under federal law. Directory information must be designated pursuant to the provisions of: (1) this subdivision; and (2) United States Code, title 20, section 1232g, and Code of Federal Regulations, title 34, section 99.37, which were in effect on January 3, 2012. (b) When conducting the directory information designation and notice process required by federal law, an educational agency or institution shall give parents and students notice of the right to refuse to let the agency or institution designate specified data about the student as directory information. This notice may be given by any means reasonably likely to inform the parents and students of the right. (c) An educational agency or institution may not designate a student's home address, telephone number, email address, or other personal contact information as directory information under this subdivision. This paragraph does not apply to a postsecondary institution. (d) When requested, educational agencies or institutions must share personal student contact information and directory information, whether public or private, with the Minnesota Department of Education, as required for federal reporting purposes. (e) When requested, educational agencies or institutions may share personal student contact information and directory information for students served in special education with postsecondary transition planning and services under section 125A.08, paragraph (b), clause (1), whether public or private, with the Department of Employment and Economic Development, as required for coordination of services to students with disabilities under sections 125A.08, paragraph (b), clause (1); 125A.023; and 125A.027. new text begin (f) Notwithstanding paragraph (c), a school may release a student's home address to a school-age child care program, as defined in section 142B.01, subdivision 26, for the purpose of mailing program information to the student's home address. A school-age child care program in receipt of information under this paragraph is prohibited from further dissemination of the student's information or using the information for any other purpose. new text end